Maryland, session 2025, HB1455.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
9–602.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1455*

HOUSE BILL 1455
(A–1) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A COVERED EMPLOYEE WHO:
(I) HAS SUFFERED:
1. A TEMPORARY PARTIAL DISABILITY UNDER § 9–615
OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
2. A TEMPORARY TOTAL DISABILITY UNDER § 9–621 OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(II) WAS CONCURRENTLY EMPLOYED BY MORE THAN ONE
EMPLOYER AT THE TIME OF THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY; AND
(III) AS A RESULT OF THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY, IS
UNABLE TO WORK AT ANY EMPLOYMENT THE COVERED EMPLOYEE WAS ENGAGED IN
AT THE TIME OF THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY OR ANY SIMILAR TYPE OF
EMPLOYMENT.
(2) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, THE WEEKLY
WAGES FROM THE EMPLOYMENTS THE COVERED EMPLOYEE WAS ENGAGED IN AT
THE TIME OF THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY SHALL BE COMBINED FOR
PURPOSES OF COMPUTING THE AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE OF THE COVERED
EMPLOYEE.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED TO:
(I) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED UNDER THIS TITLE,
RELIEVE THE EMPLOYER IN WHOSE EMPLOYMENT THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL
INJURY OCCURRED FROM LIABILITY TO PAY COMPENSATION; OR
(II) CREATE LIABILITY TO PAY COMPENSATION ON THE PART OF
ANOTHER EMPLOYER IN WHOSE EMPLOYMENT THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY
DID NOT OCCUR.
(b) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A COVERED EMPLOYEE ONLY IF
THE APPLICATION OF SUBSECTION (A–1) OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN A LOWER
AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE FOR THE COVERED EMPLOYEE.
(2) For the purpose of computing the average weekly wage of an auxiliary
police officer of Baltimore County who is a covered employee under § 9–220(a) of this title
or a member of a volunteer ambulance, ambulance and rescue, or fire company in Baltimore
County who is a covered employee under § 9–234 of this title, the wages of the covered
employee shall be:

HOUSE BILL 1455 3
[(1)] (I) if the covered employee had other employment at the time of the
accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure, the salary or wages from the other
employment;
[(2)] (II) if the covered employee had had other employment but was not
otherwise employed at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure,
the salary or wages last received by the covered employee from the other employment; or
[(3)] (III) if the covered employee had never had other employment at the
time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure, an amount that allows
minimum death or disability benefits under this title.
(c) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A COVERED EMPLOYEE ONLY IF
THE APPLICATION OF SUBSECTION (A–1) OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN A LOWER
AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE FOR THE COVERED EMPLOYEE.
(2) For the purpose of computing the average weekly wage of an individual
engaged for fire fighting by the Department of Natural Resources who is a covered employee
under § 9–207 of this title, the wages of the covered employee shall be:
[(1)] (I) the greater of:
[(i)] 1. any salary or wages received by the covered employee for
fire fighting; or
[(ii)] 2. any salary or wages earned by the covered employee in
other employment at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure;
or
[(2)] (II) if the covered employee did not receive wages for fire fighting or
from other employment at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious
exposure, an amount that allows the minimum compensation or death benefits under this
title.
(g) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A COVERED EMPLOYEE ONLY IF
THE APPLICATION OF SUBSECTION (A–1) OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN A LOWER
AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE FOR THE COVERED EMPLOYEE.
[(1)] (2) Subject to paragraph [(2)] (3) of this subsection, for the purpose
of computing the average weekly wage of an individual who is a covered employee under §
9–234 of this title, the wages of the covered employee shall be:
(i) for a covered employee who received a salary or wages from other
employment at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure, the
salary or wages from the other employment; or

HOUSE BILL 1455
(ii) for a covered employee who did not receive a salary or wages from
other employment at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure:
1. if the covered employee derived income from a source other
than salary or wages at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure,
an amount that allows the maximum compensation under this title;
2. if the covered employee was not engaged in a business
enterprise at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure, the
weekly income last received by the covered employee when engaged in a business
enterprise; or
3. if the covered employee had never been engaged in a
business enterprise at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure,
an amount that allows the minimum compensation under this title.
[(2)] (3) A yearly stipend of $5,200 or less to help offset out–of–pocket
expenses that a volunteer company, as defined in § 9–234 of this title, pays to a member
may not be used when determining the average weekly wage of the member.
(j) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO A COVERED EMPLOYEE ONLY IF
THE APPLICATION OF SUBSECTION (A–1) OF THIS SECTION RESULTS IN A LOWER
AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE FOR THE COVERED EMPLOYEE.
(2) For the purpose of computing the average weekly wage of a volunteer
deputy sheriff of Cecil County or an auxiliary volunteer of the Charles County Sheriff’s
Office who is a covered employee under § 9–233 of this title, the wages of the covered
employee shall be:
[(1)] (I) if the covered employee had other employment at the time of the
accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure, the wages from the other employment;
[(2)] (II) if the covered employee had had other employment but was not
otherwise employed at the time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure,
the wages last received by the covered employee from the other employment; or
[(3)] (III) if the covered employee had never had other employment at the
time of the accidental personal injury or last injurious exposure, an amount that allows
minimum compensation under this title.
9–615.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the wage earning capacity
of a covered employee is less while temporarily partially disabled, the employer or its
insurer shall pay the covered employee compensation that equals 50% of the difference
between:

HOUSE BILL 1455 5
(i) the average weekly wage of the covered employee; and
(ii) the wage earning capacity of the covered employee in the same
or other employment while temporarily partially disabled.
(2) The compensation payable under paragraph (1) of this subsection may
not exceed 50% of the State average weekly wage.
(b) The employer or its insurer shall pay the weekly compensation for the period
that the covered employee is temporarily partially disabled.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO THE PAYMENT OF WEEKLY
COMPENSATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ONLY IF THE
AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE OF THE COVERED EMPLOYEE IS COMPUTED UNDER §
9–602(A–1) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
EMPLOYER IN WHOSE EMPLOYMENT THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY
OCCURRED OR THE EMPLOYER’S INSURER SHALL PAY THE COVERED EMPLOYEE
WEEKLY COMPENSATION.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND OR THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’
FUND SHALL REIMBURSE THE EMPLOYER OR THE EMPLOYER’S INSURER FOR THE
AMOUNT OF WEEKLY COMPENSATION PAID UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION THAT IS BASED ON THE WEEKLY WAGES OF THE COVERED EMPLOYEE
AT OTHER EMPLOYMENT.
(II) THE FUND WITH THE HIGHER BALANCE AT THE BEGINNING
OF THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE REIMBURSEMENT REQUIRED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS TO BE MADE SHALL REIMBURSE THE
EMPLOYER OR THE EMPLOYER’S INSURER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(III) THE OBLIGATION OF THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND OR
THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND TO REIMBURSE AN EMPLOYER OR THE
EMPLOYER’S INSURER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS SUBJECT
TO A RIGHT OF THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND TO BE IMPLEADED OR A RIGHT OF
THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND OR THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND TO
DEFEND IN A CASE INVOLVING PAYMENT FROM THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND OR
THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND AS ALLOWABLE UNDER SUBTITLE 8 OR 10 OF
THIS TITLE, RESPECTIVELY.

HOUSE BILL 1455
9–621.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, if a covered
employee is temporarily totally disabled due to an accidental personal injury or an
occupational disease, the employer or its insurer shall pay the covered employee
compensation that equals two–thirds of the average weekly wage of the covered employee,
but:
(i) does not exceed the average weekly wage of the State; and
(ii) is not less than $50.
(2) If the average weekly wage of the covered employee is less than $50 at
the time of the accidental personal injury or the last injurious exposure to the hazards of
the occupational disease, the employer or its insurer shall pay the covered employee
compensation that equals the average weekly wage of the covered employee.
(b) The employer or its insurer shall pay the compensation for the period that the
covered employee is temporarily totally disabled.
(C) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES TO THE PAYMENT OF WEEKLY
COMPENSATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION ONLY IF THE
AVERAGE WEEKLY WAGE OF THE COVERED EMPLOYEE IS COMPUTED UNDER §
9–602(A–1) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
EMPLOYER IN WHOSE EMPLOYMENT THE ACCIDENTAL PERSONAL INJURY
OCCURRED OR THE EMPLOYER’S INSURER SHALL PAY THE COVERED EMPLOYEE
WEEKLY COMPENSATION.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND OR THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’
FUND SHALL REIMBURSE THE EMPLOYER OR THE EMPLOYER’S INSURER FOR THE
AMOUNT OF WEEKLY COMPENSATION PAID UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION THAT IS BASED ON THE WEEKLY WAGES OF THE COVERED EMPLOYEE
AT OTHER EMPLOYMENT.
(II) THE FUND WITH THE HIGHER BALANCE AT THE BEGINNING
OF THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH THE REIMBURSEMENT REQUIRED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS TO BE MADE SHALL REIMBURSE THE
EMPLOYER OR THE EMPLOYER’S INSURER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH.
(III) THE OBLIGATION OF THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND OR
THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND TO REIMBURSE AN EMPLOYER OR THE

HOUSE BILL 1455 7
EMPLOYER’S INSURER UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH IS SUBJECT
TO A RIGHT OF THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND TO BE IMPLEADED OR A RIGHT OF
THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND OR THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND TO
DEFEND IN A CASE INVOLVING PAYMENT FROM THE SUBSEQUENT INJURY FUND OR
THE UNINSURED EMPLOYERS’ FUND AS ALLOWABLE UNDER SUBTITLE 8 OR 10 OF
THIS TITLE, RESPECTIVELY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) Section 9–602 of the Labor and Employment Article, as enacted by Section 1
of this Act, shall be construed to apply retroactively to all active workers’ compensation
claims awarded to covered employees to whom § 9–602(a–1) of the Labor and Employment
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, applies for temporary partial disability or
temporary total disability and for which benefits are being paid as of the effective date of
this Act.
(b) The Workers’ Compensation Commission shall recalculate the average weekly
wage of a covered employee for a claim described under subsection (a) of this section in
accordance with the method required under § 9–602(a–1) of the Labor and Employment
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(c) If the recalculation of the average weekly wage under subsection (b) of this
section results in a higher weekly compensation, the increase in compensation shall be
effective beginning only with the first payment of compensation that is due on or after the
effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.